Washington statutes.
RCW 23.78.020

Election by corporation to be governed as an employee cooperative—Laws governing.

Any corporation organized under the laws of this state may elect to be governed as an employee cooperative under the provisions of this chapter, by so stating in its articles of incorporation, or articles of amendment filed in accordance with Title 23B RCW and Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

A corporation so electing shall be governed by all provisions of Title 23B RCW, except RCW 23B.07.050, 23B.13.020, and *chapter 23B.11 RCW, and except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9101; 1991 c 72 s 9; 1987 c 457 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.